District of Columbia statutes.
2-303.21

Repealed

Small purchase procurement.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 321
as added Feb. 27, 1998, D.C. Law 12-50, § 2(b), 44 DCR 6222
July 23, 2002, D.C. Law 14-180, § 2, 49 DCR 5111
Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-64, § 2(e), 56 DCR 6603
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1183.21.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Procurement Practices Small Purchase Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-87, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2992).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2 of the Small Purchase Authority Congressional Recess Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-237, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 501).
For temporary addition of section, see § 2 of the Small Purchase Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-82, June 19, 1997, 44 DCR 3719), and § 2 of the Small Purchase Authority Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-162, October 16, 1997, 44 DCR 6059).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Procurement Practices Small Purchase Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-176, November 19, 2001, 48 DCR 11055).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Procurement Practices Small Purchase Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-308, March 25, 2002, 49 DCR 3413).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Suspension of Purchase Authority in the District of Columbia Government Purchase Card Program Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-221, November 7, 2003, 50 DCR 10051).
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 6-85, the “Procurement Practices Act of 1985,” as amended, relating to Small Purchase Procurements, see Mayor’s Order 97-194, November 12, 1997 ( 44 DCR 7196).
Small Purchase Procurements, see Mayor’s Order 2009-42, March 25, 2009 ( 56 DCR 6780).